Utah statutes.
51-8-302.   Transferring management of endowment funds.
(1)  A higher education institution may only transfer the management of any
institutional fund to a manager if the transferring higher education
institution:
(a)  retains sufficient funds to cover its cash requirements; and
(b)  continues to be responsible for the proper collection, deposit, and
disbursement of the institutional fund in the manner provided by law.
(2)  The institutional funds transferred as provided in this section are
subject to all applicable provisions of this chapter and are under the
jurisdiction of the manager until the transferring higher education
institution withdraws these institutional funds from the manager.
(3)  A higher education institution may withdraw all or any part of the
institutional funds transferred to the manager, subject to any rules
established by the manager governing notice or limits on the amount of
institutional funds that may be withdrawn.
